North Carolina, session 2025, HB918.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. MINIMUM STANDARDIZED TESTING REQUIREMENTS FOR
ADMISSIONS AND SCHOLARSHIPS AT THE UNIVERSITY OF NORTH CAROLINA
SECTION 1.(a) Part 2 of Article 1 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes is amended
by adding the following new section to read:
"§ 116-11.5. Minimum standardized testing requirements for admissions and scholarships.
(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) Applicant. – Any of the following:
a. An applicant for admission to a constituent institution.
b. An applicant for a scholarship.
(2) Board of Governors. – The Board of Governors of The University of North
Carolina.
(3) Constituent institution. – A constituent institution of The University of North
Carolina.
(4) Entity of The University of North Carolina. – The Board of Governors, the
University of North Carolina System Office, a constituent institution, or the
State Education Assistance Authority.
(5) Identified test. – Any one of the following:
a. The SAT.
b. The ACT.
c. The Classic Learning Test (CLT).
(6) Scholarship. – A scholarship funded in whole or in part with State funds and
administered by an entity of The University of North Carolina.
(b) If an entity of The University of North Carolina requires or permits an applicant to
submit a standardized test score on any identified test for admissions or scholarships, the entity
shall permit the applicant to instead submit a test score on any other identified test. If the entity
requires a minimum score on any identified test, the entity shall permit the applicant to satisfy
that requirement by submitting a concordant minimum score on any other identified test."
SECTION 1.(b) This section applies beginning in the 2025-2026 academic year.
*H918-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

PART II. INCLUDE CLT10 AMONG STANDARDIZED TESTS OFFERED IN HIGH
SCHOOL
SECTION 2.(a) Part 3 of Article 10A of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes reads
as rewritten:
"Part 3. Preliminary Scholastic Aptitude Test Opportunities Encouraged.College Preparation
Assessments Encouraged.
"§ 115C-174.18. Opportunity to take Preliminary SAT/National Merit Scholarship
Qualifying Test (PSAT/NMSQT).various college preparation assessments.
Every student in the eighth through tenth grades who has completed Algebra I or who is in
the last month of Algebra I shall be given an opportunity to take a version of either the
Preliminary SAT/National Merit Scholarship Qualifying Test (PSAT/NMSQT) or
(PSAT/NMSQT), the PreACT test, at the discretion of the local school administrative unit, or the
CLT10 one time at no cost to the student. A student receiving instruction through a home school,
as provided by Part 3 of Article 39 of this Chapter, shall be eligible to participate in testing as
provided in G.S. 115C-565.1. The maximum amount of State funds used for this purpose shall
be the cost of the PSAT/NMSQT."
SECTION 2.(b) This section applies beginning in the 2025-2026 school year.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 918-First Edition